Utah statutes.
57-8a-207.   Payment of unpaid assessment by encumbrancer.

(1)  An encumbrancer holding a lien on a lot may pay any unpaid assessment due with respect to the lot.

(2)  Upon a payment described in Subsection (1), the encumbrancer has a lien on the lot for the amounts paid.

